Illinois, session 104th, HB2625.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 106B-5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/106B-5)7    Sec. 106B-5. Testimony by a victim who is a child or a 8person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 9disability or a person affected by a developmental disability.10    (a) In a proceeding in the prosecution of an offense of 11criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of 12a child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 13abuse, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, aggravated battery, 14or aggravated domestic battery, a court may order that the 15testimony of a victim who is a child under the age of 18 years 16or a person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 17disability or a person affected by a developmental disability 18be taken outside the courtroom and shown in the courtroom by 19means of a closed circuit television if:20        (1) the testimony is taken during the proceeding; and21        (2) the judge determines that testimony by the child 22    victim or victim with a moderate, severe, or profound 23    intellectual disability or victim affected by a   HB2625- 2 -LRB104 07075 RLC 17112 b1    developmental disability in the courtroom will result in 2    the child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 3    intellectual disability or person affected by a 4    developmental disability suffering serious emotional 5    distress such that the child or person with a moderate, 6    severe, or profound intellectual disability or person 7    affected by a developmental disability cannot reasonably 8    communicate or that the child or person with a moderate, 9    severe, or profound intellectual disability or person 10    affected by a developmental disability will suffer severe 11    emotional distress that is likely to cause the child or 12    person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 13    disability or person affected by a developmental 14    disability to suffer severe adverse effects. The child 15    victim or victim with a moderate, severe, or profound 16    intellectual disability or a victim affected by a 17    developmental disability does not need to testify or be 18    present in court for the judge to make the determination. 19    (b) Only the prosecuting attorney, the attorney for the 20defendant, and the judge may question the child or person with 21a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability or 22person affected by a developmental disability.23    (c) The operators of the closed circuit television shall 24make every effort to be unobtrusive.25    (d) Only the following persons may be in the room with the 26child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound   HB2625- 3 -LRB104 07075 RLC 17112 b1intellectual disability or person affected by a developmental 2disability when the child or person with a moderate, severe, 3or profound intellectual disability or person affected by a 4developmental disability testifies by closed circuit 5television:6        (1) the prosecuting attorney;7        (2) the attorney for the defendant;8        (3) the judge;9        (4) the operators of the closed circuit television 10    equipment; and11        (5) any person or persons whose presence, in the 12    opinion of the court, contributes to the well-being of the 13    child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 14    intellectual disability or person affected by a 15    developmental disability, including a person who has dealt 16    with the child in a therapeutic setting concerning the 17    abuse, a parent or guardian of the child or person with a 18    moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability or 19    person affected by a developmental disability, and court 20    security personnel.21    (e) During the child's or person with a moderate, severe, 22or profound intellectual disability or person affected by a 23developmental disability's testimony by closed circuit 24television, the defendant shall be in the courtroom and shall 25not communicate with the jury if the cause is being heard 26before a jury.  HB2625- 4 -LRB104 07075 RLC 17112 b1    (f) The defendant shall be allowed to communicate with the 2persons in the room where the child or person with a moderate, 3severe, or profound intellectual disability or person affected 4by a developmental disability is testifying by any appropriate 5electronic method.6    (f-5) There is a rebuttable presumption that the testimony 7of a victim who is a child under 13 years of age shall testify 8outside the courtroom and the child's testimony shall be shown 9in the courtroom by means of a 2-way closed circuit 10television. This presumption may be overcome if the defendant 11can prove by clear and convincing evidence that the child 12victim will not suffer severe emotional distress. 13    (f-6) Before the court permits the testimony of a victim 14outside the courtroom that is to be shown in the courtroom by 15means of a closed circuit television, the court must make a 16finding that the testimony by means of a 2-way closed circuit 17television does not prejudice the defendant. 18    (g) The provisions of this Section do not apply if the 19defendant represents himself pro se.20    (h) This Section may not be interpreted to preclude, for 21purposes of identification of a defendant, the presence of 22both the victim and the defendant in the courtroom at the same 23time.24    (i) This Section applies to prosecutions pending on or 25commenced on or after the effective date of this amendatory 26Act of 1994.  HB2625- 5 -LRB104 07075 RLC 17112 b1    (j) For the purposes of this Section, "developmental 2disability" includes, but is not limited to, cerebral palsy, 3epilepsy, and autism. 4(Source: P.A. 103-164, eff. 1-1-24.)